Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NURSE LICENSURE
SECTION 1.  ORS 678.031 is amended to read:
678.031. ORS 678.010 to 678.410 do not apply to:
(1) The employment of nurses in institutions or agencies of the federal government.
(2) The practice of nursing incidental to the planned program of study for students  enrolled in
nursing education programs approved by the Oregon State Board  of Nursing or accredited or ap-
proved by another state or United States territory  as described under ORS 678.040 and approved
by the board.
(3) Nursing practiced outside this state that is incidental to a distance  learning program pro-
vided by an institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4) The furnishing of nursing assistance in an emergency.
(5) The practice of any other occupation or profession licensed under the laws of this state.
(6) Care of the sick with or without compensation when performed  in connection with the
practice  of  the religious tenets of a well-recognized church or denomination that relies exclusively
on treatment by prayer and spiritual means by adherents thereof so long as the  adherent does not
engage in the  practice of nursing as defined in ORS 678.010 to 678.410 and 678.990 or hold oneself
out as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse.
(7) Nonresident nurses licensed and in good standing in another state if nonresident nurses are
practicing in this state on a single[ , temporary ] assignment of not to exceed 90 days, renewable for
not to exceed 90 days, for  assignments that are for the general public benefit . [ limited to the fol-
lowing:]
[(a) Transport teams; ]
[(b) Red Cross Blood Services personnel; ]
[(c) Presentation of educational programs; ]
[(d) Disaster teams; ]
[(e) Staffing  in a hospital that is responding to a temporary staffing shortage and would be other-
wise unable to meet the hospital’s staffing requirements; ]
Enrolled House Bill 4136 (HB 4136-A) Page 1
[(f) Staffing a long term care facility that is  responding to a temporary staffing shortage and would
be otherwise unable to meet its staffing requirements; ]
[(g) Providing health care for students who attend school outside of Oregon  and who are partic-
ipating in a school-sponsored event; or ]
[(h) Staffing  any of the following entities that is responding to a temporary staffing shortage and
would otherwise be unable to meet its staffing requirements: ]
[(A) An adult or juvenile residential behavioral health treatment facility; ]
[(B) An opioid treatment program; ]
[(C) A withdrawal management program; ]
[(D) A sobering center; ]
[(E) A primary care facility; or ]
[(F) A behavioral health home, as defined in ORS 414.025. ]
SECTION 2.  ORS 678.034 is amended to read:
678.034. [(1)(a) A hospital, long  term care facility or entity described in ORS 678.031 (7)(h) that
employs nurses under ORS 678.031 (7)(e), (f) or (h) shall: ]
[(A) Notify the Oregon  State Board of Nursing in writing of the number of nurses employed under
ORS 678.031 (7)(e), (f) or (h), the times of employment and the nature of the staffing shortage; ]
[(B) Certify that there is no labor dispute affecting nurses at  the hospital, long term care facility
or entity described in ORS 678.031 (7)(h); and ]
[(C) At  the request of the board, provide documentation that the nurses employed under ORS
678.031 (7)(e), (f) or (h) are licensed and in good standing in another state or United States territory. ]
[(b) A hospital, long term care  facility or entity described in ORS 678.031 (7)(h) that employs
nurses as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall  provide notice in writing of and certify
to the nurses’  exclusive bargaining representative, if any, the information described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection. ]
(1) An entity that employs a  nurse described under ORS 678.031 (7) shall notify the
Oregon State Board of  Nursing in writing of the number of nurses so employed and the time
of employment and shall certify that there is  no labor dispute affecting nurses at the entity.
In addition, at the request of the board,  the entity shall provide documentation that the
nurses so employed are  licensed and in good standing in another state or United States ter-
ritory.
(2) Nurses employed in this state under  ORS 678.031 (7)[(e), (f) or (h) ], at the time of employment,
shall apply for an Oregon license by  indorsement or, if the nurse was previously licensed in this
state, for reactivation of the nurse’s Oregon license.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 678.031 and 678.034 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2024
Act apply to periods of employment beginning on or after the  effective date of this 2024 Act.
LANE COUNTY ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE
SECTION 4. (1) The  Oregon Health Authority shall enter into an agreement with Lane
County Public Health that requires Lane County Public Health  to administer moneys as fol-
lows, taking  into consideration the continuum of health care, including emergency medical
care and other same-day health care services:
(a) As distributions to  the City of Eugene for the establishment and maintenance of a
basic life support unit; and
(b) To fund a health care access innovation fund to finance innovations that  are designed
to improve access to same-day health care while decreasing the  overall same-day health care
system costs in the greater Eugene area. As described in this paragraph:
(A) The innovations may include,  but are not limited to, a nurse advice line, community
health care response  programs, alternative medical transportation options and programming
to improve access to health care while reducing emergency department utilization.
Enrolled House Bill 4136 (HB 4136-A) Page 2
(B) The costs may include, but are not limited to, costs related to emergency medical
services, emergency department utilization and 9-1-1 emergency calls.
(2) The agreement described in subsection (1) of this section must require:
(a) Lane County Public Health  to solicit, review and select proposals for the innovations
described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, and to consult with  coordinated care organiza-
tions and other stakeholders to optimize the use of funds described  in subsection (1)(b) of
this section and leverage additional funding from other sources.
(b) Lane County Public Health to submit a report in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,
which may include recommendations for legislation, to the authority and the interim  com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to health care not later than  December 31, 2024.
The report described in this paragraph must  include a detailed description of how the funds
described in subsection (1)(b) of this section administered by Lane County Public  Health are
used.
(c) Lane County Public Health and the authority to submit a report in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 192.245, which may include recommendations for legislation, to the  interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  health care not later than December 31,
2025. The report described in this paragraph must include a detailed  description of how the
funds described in subsection (1)(b) of this section administered by Lane County Public
Health are used and whether and to what degree the innovations  described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section achieved the objectives of subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(3) The  agreement entered into under subsection (1) of this section must allow Lane
County Public Health to withhold from the funds administered under subsection (1) of this
section a reasonable amount to reimburse Lane  County Public Health for administrative
costs incurred under this section.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $4,500,000 for the purpose of carrying out  the provisions of
section 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6. Of the moneys appropriated under section  5 of this 2024 Act, the Oregon
Health Authority shall use:
(1) $1,300,000 for carrying out the provisions of section 4 (1)(a) of this 2024 Act; and
(2) $3,200,000 for carrying out the provisions of section 4 (1)(b) of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7.
Sections 4 to 6 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 8. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any  leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4136 (HB 4136-A) Page 3
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4136 (HB 4136-A) Page 4